Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB202.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 301(b) and 321(c) of Title 34 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 301. Organization of commission.* * *(b) Qualifications.--The members of the commission shall be appointed from the various geographical sections of this Commonwealth so that one and only one shall be a resident of each of the following districts:(1) The counties of Erie, Crawford, Mercer, Lawrence, Venango, Butler, Warren, Forest and Clarion, constituting the first district.(2) The counties of Beaver, Allegheny, Washington, Greene, Armstrong, Indiana, Westmoreland and Fayette, 12345678910111213141516171819 constituting the second district.(3) The counties of McKean, Elk, Jefferson, Potter, Cameron, Clearfield, Clinton and Centre, constituting the third district.(4) The counties of Cambria, Somerset, Blair, Bedford, Huntingdon and Fulton, constituting the fourth district.(5) The counties of Tioga, Lycoming, Union, Bradford, Sullivan, Columbia, Montour and Northumberland, constituting the fifth district.(6) The counties of Snyder, Mifflin, Juniata, Franklin, Perry, Cumberland, Adams, Dauphin, York, Lebanon and Lancaster, constituting the sixth district.(7) The counties of Susquehanna, Wyoming, Luzerne, Lackawanna, Wayne [and Pike], Pike, Carbon and Monroe, constituting the seventh district.(8) The counties of Chester, Bucks, Montgomery, Philadelphia and Delaware, constituting the eighth district.(9) The counties of [Carbon, Monroe,] Schuylkill, Berks, Northampton and Lehigh, constituting the ninth district.* * *§ 321. Meetings of commission.* * *(c) Quorum.--[Six] Five members appointed to the commission and in attendance at each meeting shall constitute a quorum.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0202PN0150 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425